test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-vinnjooh_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - vinnjooh: # 1B - ok
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Nom: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Gen: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Acc: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Ill: viˊnjohân
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Loc: viˊnjohist
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Com: viˊnjoháin
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Abe: vinnjoohttáá
    vinnjooh+N+Ess:    viˊnjohin
    vinnjooh+N+Par:    viˊnjohid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Nom: viˊnjoheh
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Gen: viˊnjohij
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Acc: viˊnjohijd
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Ill: viˊnjoháid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Loc: viˊnjohijn
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Com: viˊnjohijguin
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Abe: viˊnjohijttáá
